District of Columbia statutes.
10-203

Liability.

The members of the Board shall not be personally liable in damages for any official action of the said Board performed in good faith, nor shall any member of said Board be liable for any costs that may be taxed against them or the Board on account of any such official action; but such costs shall be charged to the District of Columbia and paid as other costs are paid in suits brought against the municipality; nor shall the said Board or any of its members be required to give any supersedeas bond or security for costs or damages on any appeal whatever.

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 261, ch. 265, art. I, § 2
1981 Ed., § 8-203.
1973 Ed., § 8-203.
Recreation Board abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-201.